Utah statutes.
53A-23-103.   Building Reserve Fund -- Investment of fund.
(1)  The fund shall be known as the Building Reserve Fund of _________ (name
of school district) School District.
(2)  Any interest or capital gains accrue to the benefit of the fund.
(3)  The fund may only be invested as provided in Title 51, Chapter 7, the
State Money Management Act of 1974.
